Maryland, session 2025, HB0658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
9–503.
(a) The Board consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary;
(2) the Secretary of Higher Education, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(3) the State Superintendent of Schools, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(4) a representative of the Public School Superintendents’ Association of
Maryland, appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate;
(5) the Attorney General of the State, or the Attorney General’s designee;
(6) one educator employed by the State who is engaged in the education of
juveniles residing in a residential facility; and
(7) five members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of
the Senate.
– 1 –

Ch. 456 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) The candidate who receives the highest number of votes in an election
by the educators employed by the Department shall be the educator member.
(2) The term of the educator member is 4 years.
(3) At the end of a term, the educator member continues to serve until a
successor is elected and qualifies.
(4) The Department shall adopt regulations to conduct the election of the
educator member.
(5) The educator member may not vote on any matter that relates to
appeals to the State Board of Education under § 6–202 of the Education Article.
(c) (1) To the extent practicable, the appointed members of the Board shall
reflect the diversity of the population of juveniles in the State.
(2) The appointed members of the Board shall possess a high level of
knowledge and expertise in at least one of the following areas:
(i) teaching or educational administration;
(ii) prior service on the State Board of Education or a county board
of education;
(iii) social work;
(iv) services for individuals with disabilities;
(v) working with institutionalized youth;
(vi) mental or behavioral health services;
(vii) civil rights law or advocacy;
(viii) digital learning or online administration; or
(ix) higher education administration.
(d) (1) The term of an appointed member is 4 years.
(2) THE TERMS OF APPOINTED MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS
REQUIRED BY THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON JUNE 1,
2025.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 456
[(2)] (3) At the end of a term, an appointed member continues to serve
until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
[(3)] (4) An appointed member who is appointed after a term begins
serves only for the remainder of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
APPOINTED MEMBER IS ELIGIBLE FOR REAPPOINTMENT BUT MAY NOT SERVE MORE
THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(6) A MEMBER APPOINTED AFTER A TERM BEGINS IS ELIGIBLE FOR
REAPPOINTMENT TO TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL TERMS.
[(4)] (7) To the extent practicable, the Governor shall fill any vacancy for
an appointed member on the Board within 60 days of the vacancy.
(e) The Governor may remove an appointed member only for cause.
(f) The Board shall elect from among its members a chair and a vice chair.
(g) Any action by the Board shall require:
(1) a quorum of a majority of the voting members then serving; and
(2) the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members then serving.
(h) Each member of the Board is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under
the Standard State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(i) The Department shall staff the Board.
9–505.
(a) (1) The Board shall meet publicly in the State at least [once per month] 10
TIMES PER YEAR AND, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, NOT MORE THAN ONCE PER MONTH at the times determined by:
[(1)] (I) a majority of the members then serving;
[(2)] (II) the chair of the Board; or
[(3)] (III) the Secretary.
(2) A SPECIAL MEETING OF THE BOARD THAT DOES NOT COUNT
TOWARD THE MONTHLY LIMIT MAY BE CALLED BY:
– 3 –

Ch. 456 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS THEN SERVING;
(II) THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD; OR
(III) THE SECRETARY.
(b) A majority of the members then serving constitutes a quorum.
(c) The Board shall:
(1) maintain minutes of its meetings and any other records that it
considers necessary;
(2) on request, provide information regarding its budget, activities, and
programs; and
(3) allow time for public comment at each of its meetings.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the terms of the appointed members
of the Juvenile Services Education Board established under § 9–501 of the Human Services
Article shall expire as follows:
(1) the terms of the two longest serving appointed members serving on
June 30, 2025, shall terminate on that date;
(2) the term of the longest serving appointed member serving on June 30,
2026, shall terminate on that date;
(3) the term of the longest serving appointed member serving on June 30,
2027, shall terminate on that date; and
(4) the term of the longest serving appointed member serving on June 30,
2028, shall terminate on that date.
(b) If there is more than one appointed member of the Board whose length of
service would qualify that member for the termination of the member’s term under
subsection (a) of this section, the members whose terms are subject to termination shall be
selected by randomized lottery from all those who qualify and the term of the member
selected in the lottery shall terminate on the date listed under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 456
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 5 –